Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 5. Juvenile Justice Information System [Effective until July 1, 2024]

§ 7-19-501.
Definitions. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

As used in this act:

“Adjudicated” or “adjudication” means as defined by W.S. 14-6-201(a)(i);

“Adult” means an individual who has attained the age of majority;

“Delinquent child” means as defined by W.S. 14-6-201(a)(x);

“Disposition” means the action ordered by the juvenile court judge under W.S.

14-6-229

upon adjudication of a juvenile for a delinquent act;

“Division” means the Wyoming division of criminal investigation within the office of the attorney general;

“Juvenile” means an individual who is under the age of majority;

“Qualifying offense” means conduct that, if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony under the provisions of W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii) or

35-7-1031

or under similar federal law;

“This act” means W.S.

7-19-501

through

7-19-505

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-19-502.
Record system created. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

The division shall create and maintain a database for a juvenile justice information system as provided in this act.

The database shall contain the information required by this act. Access to information in the database shall be limited as provided by W.S.

7-19-504

.

The division shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. The division shall annually report by March 1 to the joint judiciary interim committee on the numbers of entries and usage of the database.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-19-501(a)(viii).

§ 7-19-503.
Collection of juvenile justice information. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

In any case in which a juvenile is adjudicated a delinquent child for the commission of a qualifying offense, the court shall direct that, to the extent possible, the following information be collected and provided to the division:

Offender identification information including:

The juvenile offender’s name, including other names by which the juvenile is known, and social security number;

The juvenile offender’s date and place of birth;

The juvenile offender’s physical description, including sex, weight, height, race, ethnicity, eye color, hair color, scars, marks and tattoos;

The juvenile offender’s last known residential address; and

The juvenile offender’s fingerprints.

Offense identification information including:

The criminal offense for which the juvenile was adjudicated delinquent;

Identification of the juvenile court in which the juvenile was adjudicated delinquent; and

The date and description of the final disposition ordered by the juvenile court.

The information maintained by the division shall not include predisposition studies and reports, social summaries, medical or psychological reports, educational records, multidisciplinary team minutes and records or transcripts of dispositional hearings.

The division may designate codes relating to the information described in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 7-19-504.
Access to and dissemination of information. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

Information contained in the juvenile justice information system shall be accessible, whether directly or through an intermediary, to:

Other criminal justice agencies;

Any person designated for the purpose provided by W.S.

14-6-227

;

The department of family services if the subject is in the custody of the department;

An individual who has met the requirements established by the division to ensure the record will be used solely as a statistical research or reporting record and that the record is to be transferred in a form that is not individually identifiable;

Any record subject as provided by W.S.

7-19-109

.

When a subject reaches the age of majority, all information in the juvenile justice information system pertaining to that subject shall be deleted.

Any person who willfully violates subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00). Any person or entity who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be denied further access to the system.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 7-19-505.
Inspection of information. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

An individual, his parents and guardian have the right to inspect all juvenile justice record information located within this state which refers to that individual in accordance with W.S.

7-19-109

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1.